Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.03
Filing and status of foreign judgments.

A copy of any foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with the act of Congress or the statutes of this state may be filed on or after January 1, 1994, in the office of the clerk of any court of this state having jurisdiction of such action. The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a judgment of a court of this state. A judgment so filed has the same effect and is subject to the same procedures, defenses, and proceedings for reopening, vacating, or staying as a judgment of a court of this state and may be enforced or satisfied in like manner.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 3.

The filing of a foreign judgment in a Nebraska court pursuant to this section is not an action upon a foreign judgment within the meaning of section 25-205. A foreign judgment filed in a Nebraska court pursuant to this section may be collaterally attacked on the ground that the court which entered the judgment lacked jurisdiction to do so, and the resolution of the issue must be made by the Nebraska court. Deuth v. Ratigan, 256 Neb. 419, 590 N.W.2d 366 (1999).